Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1006
Eminent domain power.

The Trail Development Assistance Act shall not be construed to limit the power of eminent domain of the state or its agencies.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1506;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 381.
January 1, 2010